New Jersey, session 221, A1257.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 2 of P.L.1983, c.469 (C.18A:64-13.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.   Each public institution of higher education shall permit a person who has been in the labor market for at least two years and is unemployed or has received a layoff notice as a result of a factory or plant closing or automation to enroll without payment of tuition in a job training course, provided that the person is not eligible for any available State or federal student financial aid and that available classroom space permits and that tuition paying students constitute the minimum number required for the course.  Nothing herein shall preclude a public institution of higher education from requiring a registration fee not to exceed $20.00 per academic term. (cf: P.L.1992, c.45, s.2) 2. Section 2 of P.L.1983, c.470 (C.18A:64A-23.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.   Each county college shall permit a person who has been in the labor market for at least two years and is unemployed or has received a layoff notice as a result of a factory or plant closing or automation to enroll without payment of tuition in a job training course, provided that the person is not eligible for any available State or federal student financial aid and that available classroom space permits and that tuition paying students constitute the minimum number required for the course.  Nothing herein shall preclude a county college from requiring a registration fee not to exceed $20.00 per academic term. (cf: P.L.1992, c.45, s.4) 3. This act shall take effect immediately.